Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.42.039

Arresting officer, notification by.

(1) When a law enforcement officer arrests a person for criminal mistreatment of a child, the officer must notify child protective services.

(2) When a law enforcement officer arrests a person for criminal mistreatment of a dependent person other than a child, the officer must notify adult protective services.

[ 2002 c 219 s 5.]

NOTES:

Intent—Finding—2002 c 219: See note following RCW 9A.42.037.